Washington statutes.
RCW 32.32.460

Nonapplicability of RCW 32.32.445 and 32.32.450.

RCW 32.32.445 and 32.32.450 shall not apply to any offer with a view toward public resale made exclusively to the savings bank or underwriters or selling group acting on its behalf.

[ 1981 c 85 s 91.]